North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 3. The Governor.

§ 147-10.
Governor to reside in Raleigh; mansion and accessories.

The Governor shall reside in the City of Raleigh during his continuance in office. A convenient and commodious furnished dwelling house, supplied with necessary lights, fuel, and water, shall be provided for his accommodation; and an automobile and driver shall be provided and maintained for the use of the executive mansion.

History.

1868-69, c. 270, ss. 32, 33; Code, ss. 3325, 3326; 1885, c. 244; Rev., s. 5327; 1919, c. 307; C.S., s. 7635.

§ 147-11.
Salary and expense allowance of Governor; allowance to person designated to represent Governor’s office. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

The salary of the Governor shall be one hundred fifty-eight thousand six hundred twelve dollars ($158,612) annually, payable monthly.

The Governor shall be paid annually the sum of eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500) as an expense allowance in attending to the business for the State and for expenses out of the State and in the State in representing the interest of the State and people, incident to the duties of the office, the said allowance to be paid monthly.

In addition to the foregoing allowance, the actual expenses of the Governor while traveling outside the State on business incident to the office shall be paid by a warrant drawn on the State Treasurer. Whenever a person who is not a State official or employee is designated by the Governor to represent the Governor’s office, the person shall be paid actual travel expenses incurred in the performance of such duty; provided that the payment of the travel expense shall conform to the provisions of the biennial appropriation act in effect at the time the payment is made.

History.

1879, c. 240; Code, s. 3720; 1901, c. 8; Rev., s. 2736; 1907, c. 1009; 1911, c. 89; 1917, cc. 11, 235; 1919, c. 320; C.S., s. 3858; 1929, c. 276, s. 1; 1947, c. 994; 1953, c. 1, s. 1; 1961, c. 1157; 1963, c. 1178, s. 1; 1965, c. 1091, s. 1; 1971, c. 1083, s. 1; 1973, c. 600; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1136, s. 39; c. 1249, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 31; 1981, c. 1127, s. 7; 1983, c. 761, ss. 194, 195; c. 913, s. 45; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 217; 1985, c. 479, s. 215; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 20; 1987, c. 738, s. 11; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, ss. 6, 172; 1989, c. 752, ss. 23(a), (b), 167; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, ss. 32(a), (b), 182; 1993, c. 321, s. 48; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.1; 1995, c. 507, s. 7.1(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28(a); 1997-443, s. 33(a); 1998-153, s. 3(a); 1999-237, s. 28(a); 2000-67, s. 26(a); 2004-124, s. 31.1(b); 2005-276, s. 29.1(a); 2006-66, s. 22.1(a); 2007-323, s. 28.1(a); 2008-107, s. 26.1(a); 2012-142, s. 25.01(b); 2014-100, s. 35.1(a); 2016-94, s. 36.1(a1); 2018-5, s. 35.2(a); 2019-209, s. 3.2(a), (a1); 2021-180, s. 39.3(a).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2022. For the section as amended July 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 147-11

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 31.1(b), effective July 1, 2004, substituted “one hundred twenty-one thousand three hundred ninety-one dollars ($121,391)” for “one hundred eighteen thousand four hundred thirty dollars ($118,430)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 29.1(a), effective July 1, 2005, substituted “one hundred twenty-three thousand eight hundred nineteen dollars ($123,819)” for “one hundred twenty-one thousand three hundred ninety-one dollars ($121,391)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 22.1(a), effective July 1, 2006, substituted “one hundred thirty thousand six hundred twenty-nine dollars ($130,629)” for “one hundred twenty-three thousand eight hundred nineteen dollars ($123,819)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 28.1.(a), effective July 1, 2007, substituted “one hundred thirty-five thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars ($135,854)” for “one hundred thirty thousand six hundred twenty nine dollars ($130,629)” in the middle of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 26.1(a), effective July 1, 2008, substituted “one hundred thirty-nine thousand five hundred ninety dollars ($139,590)” for “one hundred thirty-five thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars ($135,854)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 25.01(b), effective July 1, 2012, substituted “one hundred forty-one thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($141,265)” for “one hundred thirty-nine thousand five hundred ninety dollars ($139,590)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 35.1(a), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “one hundred forty-two thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($142,265)” for “one hundred forty-one thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($141,265)” in the middle of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 36.1(a1), effective July 1, 2016, substituted “one hundred forty-four thousand three hundred ninety-nine dollars ($144,399)” for “one hundred forty-two thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($142,265)” in the middle of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 35.2(a), effective July 1, 2018, substituted “one hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred eighty-seven dollars ($147,287)” for “one hundred forty-four thousand three hundred ninety-nine dollars ($144,399)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.2(a), effective July 1, 2019, rewrote subsection (a), which formerly read: “The salary of the Governor shall be one hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred eighty-seven dollars ($147,287) annually, payable monthly.”

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.2(a1), effective July 1, 2020, rewrote subsection (a), which formerly read: “The salary of the Governor shall be one hundred fifty thousand nine hundred sixty-nine dollars ($150,969) annually, payable monthly.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 39.3(a), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “one hundred fifty-eight thousand six hundred twelve dollars ($158,612)” for “one hundred fifty-four thousand seven hundred forty-three dollars ($154,743)”; in subsection (b), substituted “Governor” for “He” at the beginning of the sentence; substituted “the” for “his”; in subsection (c), substituted “the” for “his”; substituted “the” for “such” twice in the second sentence.

§ 147-11.
Salary and expense allowance of Governor; allowance to person designated to represent Governor’s office. [Effective July 1, 2022]

The salary of the Governor shall be one hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred seventy-seven dollars ($162,577) annually, payable monthly.

The Governor shall be paid annually the sum of eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500) as an expense allowance in attending to the business for the State and for expenses out of the State and in the State in representing the interest of the State and people, incident to the duties of the office, the said allowance to be paid monthly.

In addition to the foregoing allowance, the actual expenses of the Governor while traveling outside the State on business incident to the office shall be paid by a warrant drawn on the State Treasurer. Whenever a person who is not a State official or employee is designated by the Governor to represent the Governor’s office, the person shall be paid actual travel expenses incurred in the performance of such duty; provided that the payment of the travel expense shall conform to the provisions of the biennial appropriation act in effect at the time the payment is made.

History.

1879, c. 240; Code, s. 3720; 1901, c. 8; Rev., s. 2736; 1907, c. 1009; 1911, c. 89; 1917, cc. 11, 235; 1919, c. 320; C.S., s. 3858; 1929, c. 276, s. 1; 1947, c. 994; 1953, c. 1, s. 1; 1961, c. 1157; 1963, c. 1178, s. 1; 1965, c. 1091, s. 1; 1971, c. 1083, s. 1; 1973, c. 600; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1136, s. 39; c. 1249, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 31; 1981, c. 1127, s. 7; 1983, c. 761, ss. 194, 195; c. 913, s. 45; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 217; 1985, c. 479, s. 215; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 20; 1987, c. 738, s. 11; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, ss. 6, 172; 1989, c. 752, ss. 23(a), (b), 167; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, ss. 32(a), (b), 182; 1993, c. 321, s. 48; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.1; 1995, c. 507, s. 7.1(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28(a); 1997-443, s. 33(a); 1998-153, s. 3(a); 1999-237, s. 28(a); 2000-67, s. 26(a); 2004-124, s. 31.1(b); 2005-276, s. 29.1(a); 2006-66, s. 22.1(a); 2007-323, s. 28.1(a); 2008-107, s. 26.1(a); 2012-142, s. 25.01(b); 2014-100, s. 35.1(a); 2016-94, s. 36.1(a1); 2018-5, s. 35.2(a); 2019-209, s. 3.2(a), (a1); 2021-180, s. 39.3(a), (a1).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect until July 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 147-11

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 31.1(b), effective July 1, 2004, substituted “one hundred twenty-one thousand three hundred ninety-one dollars ($121,391)” for “one hundred eighteen thousand four hundred thirty dollars ($118,430)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 29.1(a), effective July 1, 2005, substituted “one hundred twenty-three thousand eight hundred nineteen dollars ($123,819)” for “one hundred twenty-one thousand three hundred ninety-one dollars ($121,391)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 22.1(a), effective July 1, 2006, substituted “one hundred thirty thousand six hundred twenty-nine dollars ($130,629)” for “one hundred twenty-three thousand eight hundred nineteen dollars ($123,819)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 28.1.(a), effective July 1, 2007, substituted “one hundred thirty-five thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars ($135,854)” for “one hundred thirty thousand six hundred twenty nine dollars ($130,629)” in the middle of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 26.1(a), effective July 1, 2008, substituted “one hundred thirty-nine thousand five hundred ninety dollars ($139,590)” for “one hundred thirty-five thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars ($135,854)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 25.01(b), effective July 1, 2012, substituted “one hundred forty-one thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($141,265)” for “one hundred thirty-nine thousand five hundred ninety dollars ($139,590)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 35.1(a), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “one hundred forty-two thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($142,265)” for “one hundred forty-one thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($141,265)” in the middle of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 36.1(a1), effective July 1, 2016, substituted “one hundred forty-four thousand three hundred ninety-nine dollars ($144,399)” for “one hundred forty-two thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars ($142,265)” in the middle of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 35.2(a), effective July 1, 2018, substituted “one hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred eighty-seven dollars ($147,287)” for “one hundred forty-four thousand three hundred ninety-nine dollars ($144,399)” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.2(a), effective July 1, 2019, rewrote subsection (a), which formerly read: “The salary of the Governor shall be one hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred eighty-seven dollars ($147,287) annually, payable monthly.”

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.2(a1), effective July 1, 2020, rewrote subsection (a), which formerly read: “The salary of the Governor shall be one hundred fifty thousand nine hundred sixty-nine dollars ($150,969) annually, payable monthly.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 39.3(a), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “one hundred fifty-eight thousand six hundred twelve dollars ($158,612)” for “one hundred fifty-four thousand seven hundred forty-three dollars ($154,743)”; in subsection (b), substituted “Governor” for “He” at the beginning of the sentence; substituted “the” for “his”; in subsection (c), substituted “the” for “his”; substituted “the” for “such” twice in the second sentence.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 39.3(a1), effective July 1, 2022, in subsection (a), substituted “one hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred seventy-seven dollars ($162,277)” for “one hundred fifty-eight thousand six hundred twelve dollars ($158,612).”

§ 147-11.1.
Succession to office of Governor; Acting Governor.

Lieutenant Governor. —

The Lieutenant Governor-elect shall become Governor upon the failure of the Governor-elect to qualify. The Lieutenant Governor shall become Governor upon the death, resignation, or removal from office of the Governor. The further order of succession to the office of Governor shall be prescribed by law. A successor shall serve for the remainder of the term of the Governor whom he succeeds and until a new Governor is elected and qualified.

During the absence of the Governor from the State, or during the physical or mental incapacity of the Governor to perform the duties of his office, the Lieutenant Governor shall be Acting Governor. The further order of succession as Acting Governor shall be prescribed by law.

President of Senate, Speaker of the House and Other Officers. —

If, by reason of failure to qualify, death, resignation, or removal from office, there is neither a Governor nor a Lieutenant Governor to discharge the powers and duties of the office of Governor, then the President of the Senate shall, upon his resignation as President of the Senate and as Senator, become Governor.

If, at the time when under subdivision (1) of this subsection the President of the Senate is to become Governor, there is no President of the Senate, or the President of the Senate fails to qualify as Governor, then the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall, upon his resignation as Speaker and as Representative, become Governor.

If, at the time when under subdivision (2) of this subsection the Speaker of the House of Representatives is to become Governor, there is no Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives fails to qualify as Governor, then that officer of the State of North Carolina who is highest on the following list, and who is not under disability to serve as Governor, shall, upon his resignation of the office which places him in the order of succession, become Governor: Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Superintendent of Public Instruction, Attorney General, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, and Commissioner of Insurance.

Acting Governor Generally. —

If, by reason of absence from the State or physical or mental incapacity, there is neither a Governor nor a Lieutenant Governor qualified to discharge the powers and duties of the office of Governor, then the President of the Senate shall become Acting Governor.

If, at the time when under subdivision (1) of this subsection the President of the Senate is to become Acting Governor, there is no President of the Senate, or the President of the Senate fails to qualify as Acting Governor, then the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall become Acting Governor.

If, at the time when under subdivision (2) of this subsection the Speaker of the House of Representatives is to become Acting Governor, there is no Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives fails to qualify as Acting Governor, then that officer of the State of North Carolina who is highest on the following list, and who is not under disability to serve as Acting Governor, shall become Acting Governor: Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Superintendent of Public Instruction, Attorney General, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, and Commissioner of Insurance.

Governor Serving under Subsection (c). — An individual serving as Acting Governor under subsection (c) of this section shall continue to act for the remainder of the term of the Governor whom he succeeds and until a new Governor is elected and qualified, except that:

If his tenure as Acting Governor is founded in whole or in part upon the absence of both the Governor and Lieutenant Governor from the State, then he shall act only until the Governor or Lieutenant Governor returns to the State; and

If his tenure as Acting Governor is founded in whole or in part upon the physical or mental incapacity of the Governor or Lieutenant Governor, then he shall act only until the removal of the incapacity of the Governor or Lieutenant Governor.

Officers to Which Subsections (b), (c) and (d) Applicable. — Subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section shall apply only to such officers as are eligible to the office of Governor under the Constitution of North Carolina, and only to officers who are not under impeachment by the House of Representatives at the time they are to become Governor or Acting Governor.

Compensation of Acting Governor. — During the period that any individual serves as Acting Governor under subsection (c) of this section, his compensation shall be at the rate then provided by law in the case of the Governor.

History.

1961, c. 992, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to succession to the office of Governor, see also N.C. Const., Art. III, § 3.

§ 147-12.
Powers and duties of Governor. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

In addition to the powers and duties prescribed by the Constitution, the Governor has the powers and duties prescribed in this and the following sections:

To supervise the official conduct of all executive and ministerial officers; and when the Governor deems it advisable to visit all State institutions for the purpose of inquiring into the management and needs of the same.

To see that all offices are filled, and the duties thereof performed, or in default thereof apply such remedy as the law allows, and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the General Assembly therewith.

To make the appointments and fill the vacancies not otherwise provided for in all departments.In every case where the Governor is authorized by statute to make an appointment to fill a State office, the Governor may also appoint to fill any vacancy occurring in that office, and the person the Governor appoints shall serve for the unexpired term of the office and until the person’s successor is appointed and qualified.In every case where the Governor is authorized by statute to appoint to fill a vacancy in an office in the executive branch of State government, the Governor may appoint an acting officer to serve

During the physical or mental incapacity of the regular holder of the office to discharge the duties of the office,

During the continued absence of the regular holder of the office, or

During a vacancy in an office and pending the selection and qualification, in the manner prescribed by statute, of a person to serve for the unexpired term.An acting officer appointed in accordance with this subsection may perform any act and exercise any power which a regularly appointed holder of such office could lawfully perform and exercise. All powers granted to an acting officer under this subsection shall expire immediately

a.

Upon the termination of the incapacity of the officer in whose stead the person acts,

b.

Upon the return of the officer in whose stead the person acts, or

c.

Upon the selection and qualification, in the manner prescribed by statute, of a person to serve for the unexpired term.The Governor may determine (after such inquiry as the Governor deems appropriate) that any of the officers referred to in this paragraph is physically or mentally incapable of performing the duties of the office. The Governor may also determine that such incapacity has terminated.The compensation of an acting officer appointed pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision shall be fixed by the Governor.

(3a)

To make appointments to fill vacancies in offices subject to appointment by the General Assembly as provided in

G.S. 120-122

.

(3b)

Whenever a statute calls for the Governor to appoint one person from each congressional district to a board or commission, and at the time of enactment of that statute, the gubernatorial appointments do not cover all of the congressional districts, then the Governor, in filling vacancies on that board or commission as they occur, shall make appointments to satisfy that requirement, but shall not be required to remove any person from office to satisfy the requirement.

(3c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a statute calls for the Governor to appoint a person to an office subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, the Governor shall notify the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by May 15 of the year in which the appointment is to be made of the name of the person the Governor is submitting to the General Assembly for confirmation.

(3d)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a statute calls for the Governor to appoint a person to an office subject to confirmation by the Senate, the Governor shall notify the President of the Senate by May 15 of the year in which the appointment is to be made of the name of the person the Governor is submitting to the General Assembly for confirmation.

To be the sole official organ between the government of this State and other states, or the government of the United States.

To have the custody of the great seal of the State.

If the Governor is apprised by the affidavits of two responsible citizens of the State that there is imminent danger that the statute of this State forbidding prizefighting is about to be violated, the Governor shall use, as far as necessary, the civil and military power of the State to prevent it, and to have the offenders arrested and bound to keep the peace.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 32.30(j), effective July 1, 1999.

In carrying out ex officio duties, to designate the Governor’s personal representative to attend meetings and to act in the Governor’s behalf as the Governor directs.

To appoint such personal staff as the Governor deems necessary to carry out effectively the responsibilities of the Governor’s office.

To contract in behalf of the State with the government of the United States to the extent allowed by the laws of North Carolina for the purpose of securing the benefits available to this State under the Federal Highway Safety Act of 1966. To that end, the Governor shall coordinate the activities of any and all departments and agencies of this State and its subdivisions relating thereto.

Upon being furnished information from law-enforcement officers that public roads or highways or other public vehicular areas, as defined in

G.S. 20-4.01

, are being blocked by privately owned and operated vehicles or by any other means, thereby impeding the free flow of goods and merchandise in North Carolina, if such information warrants, to declare that a state of emergency exists in the affected area, and to order that the Highway Patrol and/or National Guard remove the offending vehicles or other causes of the blockade from the emergency area.

To name and locate State government buildings, monuments, memorials, and improvements, as provided by G.S. 143B-373(a)(1).

To oversee and approve all memoranda of understanding and agreements between the State and foreign governments, as defined in

G.S. 66-280

(c), and international organizations. Any memoranda of understanding or agreements under this subsection to be signed on behalf of the State must first be approved by the Governor after review by the Attorney General, and after execution filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with

G.S. 66-280

.

To negotiate and enter into Class III Tribal-State gaming compacts, and amendments thereto, on behalf of the State consistent with State law and the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, Public Law 100-497, as necessary to allow a federally recognized Indian tribe to operate gaming activities in this State as permitted under federal law. The Governor shall report any gaming compact, or amendment thereto, to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.

The Department of Transportation, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, the State Highway Patrol, the Wildlife Resources Commission, the Division of Parks and Recreation in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, and the Division of Marine Fisheries in the Department of Environmental Quality shall deliver to the Governor by February 1 of each year detailed information on the agency’s litter enforcement, litter prevention, and litter removal efforts. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall deliver to the Governor, by February 1 of each year, detailed information on the enforcement of the littering laws of the State, including the number of charges and convictions under the littering laws of the State. The Governor shall gather the information submitted by the respective agencies and deliver a consolidated annual report, on or before March 1 of each year, to the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, and the House of Representatives and the Senate Appropriations committees with jurisdiction over Natural and Economic Resources.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 27; 1870-1, c. 111; 1883, c. 71; Code, s. 3320; 1895, c. 28, s. 5; 1905, c. 446; Rev., s. 5328; C.S., s. 7636; 1955, c. 910, s. 3; 1959, c. 285; 1967, c. 1253; 1973, c. 1148; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, ss. 3, 4, 68; 1983, c. 913, s. 46; 1985, c. 122, s. 5; c. 757, s. 181(a); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 106, 107; 1997-14, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 32.30(j); 1999-260, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 92; 2001-512, s. 9; 2001-513, s. 29(a); 2006-6, s. 6; 2006-79, s. 15; 2006-203, s. 114; 2006-259, s. 33(a); 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(g), (h); 2012-83, s. 58; 2015-241, s. 14.30(ccc); 2017-102, ss. 28, 45; 2017-186, s. 2(ssssss).

Cross References.

As to the Governor’s power to appoint, see N.C. Const., Art. III, §§ 5 and 7, and N.C. Const., Art. IV, § 19.

For provisions placing the Governor and Council of State in charge of the State’s interest in railroads, canals and other works of internal improvements, see

G.S. 124-1

et seq.

As to Class III gaming on Indian lands, see

G.S. 14-292.2

.

As to Indian Gaming Education Revenue Fund, see

G.S. 143C-9-7

.

As to investment of surplus State funds, see

G.S. 147-69.1

.

§ 147-12.
Powers and duties of Governor. [Effective January 1, 2023]

In addition to the powers and duties prescribed by the Constitution, the Governor has the powers and duties prescribed in this and the following sections:

To supervise the official conduct of all executive and ministerial officers; and when the Governor deems it advisable to visit all State institutions for the purpose of inquiring into the management and needs of the same.

To see that all offices are filled, and the duties thereof performed, or in default thereof apply such remedy as the law allows, and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the General Assembly therewith.

To make the appointments and fill the vacancies not otherwise provided for in all departments.In every case where the Governor is authorized by statute to make an appointment to fill a State office, the Governor may also appoint to fill any vacancy occurring in that office, and the person the Governor appoints shall serve for the unexpired term of the office and until the person’s successor is appointed and qualified.In every case where the Governor is authorized by statute to appoint to fill a vacancy in an office in the executive branch of State government, the Governor may appoint an acting officer to serve

During the physical or mental incapacity of the regular holder of the office to discharge the duties of the office,

During the continued absence of the regular holder of the office, or

During a vacancy in an office and pending the selection and qualification, in the manner prescribed by statute, of a person to serve for the unexpired term.An acting officer appointed in accordance with this subsection may perform any act and exercise any power which a regularly appointed holder of such office could lawfully perform and exercise. All powers granted to an acting officer under this subsection shall expire immediately

a.

Upon the termination of the incapacity of the officer in whose stead the person acts,

b.

Upon the return of the officer in whose stead the person acts, or

c.

Upon the selection and qualification, in the manner prescribed by statute, of a person to serve for the unexpired term.The Governor may determine (after such inquiry as the Governor deems appropriate) that any of the officers referred to in this paragraph is physically or mentally incapable of performing the duties of the office. The Governor may also determine that such incapacity has terminated.The compensation of an acting officer appointed pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision shall be fixed by the Governor.

(3a)

To make appointments to fill vacancies in offices subject to appointment by the General Assembly as provided in

G.S. 120-122

.

(3b)

Whenever a statute calls for the Governor to appoint one person from each congressional district to a board or commission, and at the time of enactment of that statute, the gubernatorial appointments do not cover all of the congressional districts, then the Governor, in filling vacancies on that board or commission as they occur, shall make appointments to satisfy that requirement, but shall not be required to remove any person from office to satisfy the requirement.

(3c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a statute calls for the Governor to appoint a person to an office subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, the Governor shall notify the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by May 15 of the year in which the appointment is to be made of the name of the person the Governor is submitting to the General Assembly for confirmation.

(3d)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a statute calls for the Governor to appoint a person to an office subject to confirmation by the Senate, the Governor shall notify the President of the Senate by May 15 of the year in which the appointment is to be made of the name of the person the Governor is submitting to the General Assembly for confirmation.

To be the sole official organ between the government of this State and other states, or the government of the United States.

To have the custody of the great seal of the State.

If the Governor is apprised by the affidavits of two responsible citizens of the State that there is imminent danger that the statute of this State forbidding prizefighting is about to be violated, the Governor shall use, as far as necessary, the civil and military power of the State to prevent it, and to have the offenders arrested and bound to keep the peace.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 32.30(j), effective July 1, 1999.

In carrying out ex officio duties, to designate the Governor’s personal representative to attend meetings and to act in the Governor’s behalf as the Governor directs.

To appoint such personal staff as the Governor deems necessary to carry out effectively the responsibilities of the Governor’s office.

To contract in behalf of the State with the government of the United States to the extent allowed by the laws of North Carolina for the purpose of securing the benefits available to this State under the Federal Highway Safety Act of 1966. To that end, the Governor shall coordinate the activities of any and all departments and agencies of this State and its subdivisions relating thereto.

Upon being furnished information from law-enforcement officers that public roads or highways or other public vehicular areas, as defined in

G.S. 20-4.01

, are being blocked by privately owned and operated vehicles or by any other means, thereby impeding the free flow of goods and merchandise in North Carolina, if such information warrants, to declare that a state of emergency exists in the affected area, and to order that the Highway Patrol and/or National Guard remove the offending vehicles or other causes of the blockade from the emergency area.

To name and locate State government buildings, monuments, memorials, and improvements, as provided by G.S. 143B-373(a)(1).

To oversee and approve all memoranda of understanding and agreements between the State and foreign governments, as defined in

G.S. 66-280

(c), and international organizations. Any memoranda of understanding or agreements under this subsection to be signed on behalf of the State must first be approved by the Governor after review by the Attorney General, and after execution filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with

G.S. 66-280

.

To negotiate and enter into Class III Tribal-State gaming compacts, and amendments thereto, on behalf of the State consistent with State law and the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, Public Law 100-497, as necessary to allow a federally recognized Indian tribe to operate gaming activities in this State as permitted under federal law. The Governor shall report any gaming compact, or amendment thereto, to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.

The Department of Transportation, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, the State Highway Patrol, the Wildlife Resources Commission, the Division of Parks and Recreation in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, and the Division of Marine Fisheries in the Department of Environmental Quality shall deliver to the Governor by February 1 of each year detailed information on the agency’s litter enforcement, litter prevention, and litter removal efforts. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall deliver to the Governor, by February 1 of each year, detailed information on the enforcement of the littering laws of the State, including the number of charges and convictions under the littering laws of the State. The Governor shall gather the information submitted by the respective agencies and deliver a consolidated annual report, on or before March 1 of each year, to the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, and the House of Representatives and the Senate Appropriations committees with jurisdiction over Natural and Economic Resources.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 27; 1870-1, c. 111; 1883, c. 71; Code, s. 3320; 1895, c. 28, s. 5; 1905, c. 446; Rev., s. 5328; C.S., s. 7636; 1955, c. 910, s. 3; 1959, c. 285; 1967, c. 1253; 1973, c. 1148; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, ss. 3, 4, 68; 1983, c. 913, s. 46; 1985, c. 122, s. 5; c. 757, s. 181(a); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 106, 107; 1997-14, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 32.30(j); 1999-260, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 92; 2001-512, s. 9; 2001-513, s. 29(a); 2006-6, s. 6; 2006-79, s. 15; 2006-203, s. 114; 2006-259, s. 33(a); 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(g), (h); 2012-83, s. 58; 2015-241, s. 14.30(ccc); 2017-102, ss. 28, 45; 2017-186, s. 2(ssssss); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Cross References.

As to the Governor’s power to appoint, see N.C. Const., Art. III, §§ 5 and 7, and N.C. Const., Art. IV, § 19.

For provisions placing the Governor and Council of State in charge of the State’s interest in railroads, canals and other works of internal improvements, see

G.S. 124-1

et seq.

As to Class III gaming on Indian lands, see

G.S. 14-292.2

.

As to Indian Gaming Education Revenue Fund, see

G.S. 143C-9-7

.

As to investment of surplus State funds, see

G.S. 147-69.1

.

§ 147-13.
May convene Council of State; quorum; journal.

The Governor may convene the Council for consultation whenever he may deem it proper. In all meetings of the Council of State, five members exclusive of the Governor shall constitute a quorum.

The advice and proceedings of the Council of State shall be entered in a journal, to be kept for this purpose exclusively and signed by all members present. Any member of the Council may have entered in the journal his dissent to any part of the journal. The journal shall be maintained by the Governor and shall be placed before the General Assembly when called for by either house.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 40; Code, s. 3335; Rev., s. 5329; C.S., s. 7637; 1971, cc. 32, 151.

§ 147-13.1.
Governor’s power to consolidate State agencies.

The Governor is hereby authorized to direct the inauguration of studies to determine which agencies of the State conduct operations which are so nearly related to the operations of one or more other agencies that a consolidation would produce the same or a more efficient operational result at a reduction in cost, and to prepare recommendations to be presented to the 1971 General Assembly to effect such consolidations.

For purposes of conducting the study, the Governor is authorized to utilize funds available to him from private sources, or from federal or other governmental grants, to be matched, as may be required, by funds available within the existing Department of Administration budget.

The Governor shall direct that agencies which should be consolidated with or absorbed into other agencies having similar responsibilities and duties, as determined by the outcome of the study, shall be so consolidated or absorbed when, in his opinion, efficiency in State governmental operations will be increased thereby, or when such consolidation will result in a reduction in the cost of administering State activities without a reduction in the effectiveness of such operations; provided, however, that the Governor shall not direct such consolidation or combination as would diminish the duty or authority of any State agency or institution created by act of the General Assembly.

History.

1969, c. 1209, ss. 1-3.

§ 147-14.
Appointment of private secretary; official correspondence preserved; books produced before General Assembly.

The Governor shall appoint a private secretary, who shall enter in books kept for that purpose all such letters, written by and to the Governor, as are official and important, and such other letters as the Governor shall think necessary. Such books shall be deposited in the office of the executive by the private secretary, and there carefully preserved, and the Governor shall produce the same before the General Assembly whenever requested.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, ss. 33, 34; Code, ss. 3326, 3327; Rev., s. 5330; C.S., s. 7638.

§ 147-15.
Salary of private secretary.

The salary of the private secretary to the Governor shall be fixed by the Governor.

History.

R.C., c. 102, s. 12; 1856-7, p. 71, res; 1881, c. 346; Code, ss. 1689, 3721; P.R. 1901, c. 405; 1903, c. 729; Rev., s. 2737; 1907, c. 830; 1911, c. 95; 1913, c. 1; 1915, c. 50; 1917, c. 214; C.S., s. 3859; 1921, c. 227; 1929, c. 322, ss. 1, 2; 1945, c. 45; 1953, c. 675, s. 22; 1955, c. 910, s. 4; c. 1313, s. 8; 1961, c. 738, s. 1; 1983, c. 717, s. 88.

§ 147-15.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 379, s. 11.